California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 marketplace facilitator, as defined in Section 6041, to facilitate sales for delivery in this state and the marketplace facilitator stored the retailer’s inventory in this state.

(c) A qualifying retailer shall be relieved of the penalties imposed pursuant to this part with respect to sales made from April 1, 2016, to March 31, 2019, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 34, Sec. 9.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6487.1.

In the case of a deficiency arising under this part during the lifetime of a decedent, a notice of deficiency determination shall be served within four months after written request therefor, in the form required by the department, by the fiduciary of the estate or trust or by any other person liable for the tax or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 6.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6487.2.

(a) A notice of determination issued pursuant to Section 6486, 6515, or 6536 to an individual who was a general partner, as shown on the department’s records, and who, prior to the period covered by the determination, withdrew from the partnership, causing a change in ownership, and failed to notify the department, shall be served within four years after the last day of the calendar month following the quarterly period in which the change of ownership occurred.

(b) An individual who was a general partner, as shown on the department’s records, who withdraws from a partnership without notifying the department of the change in ownership, shall not be liable for any unpaid, self-assessed liability of the partnership that becomes
 due at least three years after the last day of the calendar month following the quarterly period in which the change in ownership occurred.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not apply to either of the following:

(1) Cases of fraud or intent to evade this part or other administrative or interpretive regulations.

(2) Any partners who retain an ownership interest in a corporation that is a successor to the partnership.

(d) For purposes of this part, change in ownership means that a new “person,” as defined in Section 6005, is created by the action of the former owner by means of a sale, an incorporation, an addition or elimination of one or more partners, or the termination of a spouse’s ownership or community property interest due to legal separation or
 divorce.

(e) For purposes of this section, “individual” includes only natural persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 7.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6487.3.

(a) (1) For persons that elect to report qualified use tax in accordance with Section 6452.1, except in the case of fraud, intent to avoid this part or authorized rules and regulations issued by the department, or the gross understatement of qualified use taxes, every notice of a deficiency determination with respect to the qualified use tax shall be served within three years after the last day for which an acceptable tax return is due or filed, whichever occurs later.

(2) In the case of a gross understatement of qualified use tax, every notice of a deficiency determination with respect to the qualified use tax shall be served within six years after the last day for which an acceptable tax return is due or filed, whichever occurs later.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a “gross understatement of qualified use tax” is a deficiency that is in excess of 25 percent of the amount of qualified use tax reported on a person’s acceptable tax return. In the case of married individuals filing separate California personal income tax returns, the total amount of qualified use tax reported will be considered in determining whether there is a gross understatement of qualified use tax.

(4) For purposes of this
 section, “acceptable tax return” means a timely filed original return that is filed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 18501), Article 2 (commencing with Section 18601), Section 18633, Section 18633.5 of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18501) of Part 10.2, or Article 3 (commencing with Section 23771) of Chapter 4 of Part 11.

(b) This section applies to reporting of purchases of tangible personal property made on or after January 1, 2010, in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 8.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6488.

If before the expiration of the time prescribed in Section 6487 for serving a notice of deficiency determination the taxpayer has consented in writing to service of the notice after such time, the notice may be served at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 9.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Determinations if No Return Made [6511. - 6515.]

6511.

If any person fails to make a return, the board shall make an estimate of the amount of the gross receipts of the person, or, as the case may be, of the amount of the total sales price of tangible personal property sold or purchased by the person, the storage, use, or other consumption of which in this state is subject to the use tax. The estimate shall be made for the period or periods in respect to which the person failed to make a return and shall be based upon any information which is in the board’s possession or may come in its possession. Upon the basis of this estimate the board shall compute and determine the amount of tax or other amount
 required to be paid to the state, adding to the sum thus arrived at a penalty equal to 10 percent thereof. One or more determinations may be made for one or for more than one period. When a business is discontinued a determination may be made at any time thereafter, within the periods specified in Section 6487, as to liability arising out of that business, irrespective of whether the determination is issued prior to the due date of the liability as otherwise specified in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 930, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

6512.

In making a determination the board may offset overpayments for a period or periods, together with interest on the overpayments, against underpayments for another period or periods, against penalties, and against the interest on the underpayments. The interest on underpayments and overpayments shall be computed in the manner set forth in Sections 6591 and 6907.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6513.

The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the month following the quarterly period for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1020, Sec. 4.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 65 of Ch. 1020.)
-------------------------------------------

6514.

If the failure of any person to file a return is due to fraud or an intent to evade this part or rules and regulations, a penalty of 25 per cent of the amount required to be paid by the person, exclusive of penalties, shall be added thereto in addition to the 10 per cent penalty provided in Section 6511.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 247.)
-------------------------------------------

6514.1.

Any purchaser of a vehicle, vessel, or aircraft who registers it outside the State of California for the purpose of evading the payment of taxes due under this part shall be liable for a penalty of 50 percent of any tax determined to be due on the sales price of the vehicle, vessel, or aircraft.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1490, Sec. 7.   Effective September 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

6515.

Promptly after making its determination, the department shall give to the person written notice of the estimate, determination, and penalty, the notice to be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 10.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Jeopardy Determinations [6536. - 6539.]

6536.

If the board believes that the collection of any tax or any amount of tax required to be collected and paid to the state or of any determination or other amount required to be paid to the state will be jeopardized by delay, it shall thereupon make a determination of the tax or amount of tax required to be collected or other amount, noting that fact upon the determination. The amount determined is immediately due and payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 930, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

6537.

If the amount specified in the determination is not paid within 10 days after service of notice thereof upon the person against whom the determination is made, the amount becomes final at the expiration of the 10 days, unless a petition for redetermination is filed within the 10 days, and the delinquency penalty and the interest provided in Section 6591 shall attach to the amount of the tax or the amount of the tax required to be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6538.

The person against whom a jeopardy determination is made may petition for the redetermination thereof pursuant to Article 5 of this chapter. He shall, however, file the petition for redetermination with the board within 10 days after the service upon him of notice of the determination. The person shall also within the 10-day period deposit with the board such security as it may deem necessary to insure compliance with this part. The security may be sold by the board in the manner prescribed by Section 6701.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6538.5.

In accordance with such rules and regulations as the board may prescribe, the person against whom a jeopardy determination is made may apply for an administrative hearing for one or more of the following purposes:

(a) To establish that the determination is excessive; or

(b) To establish that the sale of property that may be seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination or any part thereof shall be delayed pending the administrative hearing because the sale would result in irreparable injury to the person; or

(c) To request the release of all or a part of the property to the person; or 

(d) To request a stay of collection activities.

The application shall be filed within 30 days after service of the notice of jeopardy determination and shall be in writing and state the specific factual and legal grounds upon which it is founded. No security need be posted to file the application and to obtain this hearing. However, if the person does not deposit within the 10-day period prescribed in Section 6538, such security as the board may deem necessary to ensure compliance with this part, the filing of the application shall not operate as a stay of collection activities, except sale of property seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination. Upon a showing of good cause for failure to file a timely application for administrative hearing, the board may
 allow a filing of the application and grant the person an administrative hearing. The filing of an application pursuant to this section shall not affect provisions of Section 6537 relating to the finality date of the determination or to penalty or interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 329.)
-------------------------------------------

6539.

Any notice required by this article shall be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 11.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Redeterminations [6561. - 6566.]

6561.

Any person against whom a determination is made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 6481) or 3 (commencing with Section 6511) or any person directly interested may petition for a redetermination within 30 days after service upon the person of notice thereof. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the 30-day period, the determination becomes final at the expiration of that period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 149.)
-------------------------------------------

6561.5.

Every petition for redetermination shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds at any time prior to the date on which the board issues its order or decision upon the petition for redetermination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 881.)
-------------------------------------------

6562.

If a petition for redetermination is filed within the 30-day period, the board shall reconsider the determination and, if the person has so requested in his petition, shall grant the person an oral hearing and shall give him 10 days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing. The board may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6563.

(a) The board may decrease or increase the amount of the determination before it becomes final, but the amount may be increased only if a claim for the increase is asserted by the board at or before the hearing. Unless the penalty imposed by Section 6485 or Section 6514 applies to the amount of the determination as originally made or as increased, the claim for increase must be asserted during one of the following applicable periods:

(1) In the case of any taxpayer whose reported gross receipts and total sales price of property sold or purchased by him or her is less
 than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in each calendar quarter of the period or periods to which the determination applies, within three years after the first deficiency determination or within three years after the time tax records requested by the board were made available, whichever is later.

(2) In the case of any other taxpayer, within eight years after the first deficiency determination or within eight years after the time tax records requested by the board were made available, whichever is later.

(b) If the taxpayer and the board mutually agree, the time limits specified in subdivision (a) may be waived.

(c) The board shall specify the information on which it bases its increase.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1728, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6564.

The order or decision of the board upon a petition for redetermination becomes final 30 days after service upon the petitioner of notice thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6565.

All determinations made by the board under Articles 2 or 3 of this chapter are due and payable at the time they become final. If they are not paid when due and payable, a penalty of 10 per cent of the amount of the determination, exclusive of interest and penalties, shall be added thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6566.

Any notice required by this article shall be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 12.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Interest and Penalties [6591. - 6597.]

6591.

(a) Any person who fails to pay any tax to the state or any amount of tax required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 6481) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 6511) of this chapter, within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the tax or amount of the tax, in addition to the tax or amount of tax, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date
 on which the tax or the amount of tax required to be collected became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(b) Any person who fails to file a return in accordance with the due date set forth in Section 6451 or the due date established by the board in accordance with Section 6455, shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of taxes, exclusive of prepayments, with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(c) The penalties imposed by this section shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the taxes for which the return is required, exclusive of any prepayments, for any one return.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6591.3.

(a) An accuracy-related penalty shall be imposed under this part if a person fails to accurately disclose information in the information return required by Section 6452.05 such that the information return is substantially inconsistent with the return required under Section 6452, and that person shall pay a penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each return not accurately filed.

(b) The accuracy-related penalty imposed by this section shall not be assessed if the penalty of Section 6452.05 is imposed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 17, Sec. 7.   (AB 90)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6591.5.

(a) (1) For interest required to be paid to the state upon underpayments of tax to the state, “ modified adjusted rate per annum” means the adjusted annual rate established pursuant to subdivision (c), plus three percentage points. 

(2) For interest required to be paid by the state upon overpayments of tax, “modified adjusted rate per annum” means the adjusted annual rate established pursuant to subdivision (d). 

(b) “Modified adjusted rate per month,
 or fraction thereof” means the modified adjusted rate per annum divided by 12. 

(c) The rate established for interest to be paid upon underpayments of tax shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of Section 6621 of the Internal Revenue Code which establish the underpayment rate, except that the determination specified in Section 6621(b) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified to be determined semiannually as follows: 

(1) The rate for January shall apply for the following July 1 to December 31, inclusive.

(2) The rate for July shall apply for the following January 1 to June 30, inclusive. 

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the rate established for interest to be paid by the state upon overpayments of
 tax shall be equal to the bond equivalent rate of 13-week treasury bills auctioned, rounded to the nearest full percent (or if a multiple of one-half of 1 percent, the rate shall be increased to the next highest full percent), as follows: 

(A) The bond equivalent rate of 13-week treasury bills established at the first auction held during the month of January shall apply for the following July 1 to December 31, inclusive. 

(B) The bond equivalent rate of 13-week treasury bills established at the first auction held during the month of July shall apply for the following January 1 to June 30, inclusive. 

(2) For the period July 1, 1991, through June 30, 1992, the rate to be paid by the state upon overpayments of tax shall be equal to the bond equivalent rate of 13-week treasury bills established at the auction held on
 July 1, 1991, rounded to the nearest full percent (or if a multiple of one-half of 1 percent, the rate shall be increased to the next highest full percent). 

(e) For purposes of this part, and any other provision of law referencing this method of computation, in computing the amount of any interest required to be paid by the state or by the taxpayer, or any other amount determined by reference to that amount of interest, that interest and that amount shall be computed as simple interest, not compound interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 236, Sec. 5.2.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6591.6.

(a) If the department finds, taking into account all facts and circumstances, that it is inequitable to compute interest at the modified adjusted rate per month or fraction thereof, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6591.5, interest shall be computed at the modified adjusted daily rate from the date on which the tax or prepayment was due until the date of payment, if all of the following occur:

(1) The payment of tax or the prepayment was made one business day after the date the tax or prepayment was due.

(2) The person was granted relief from all penalties that applied to that payment of tax or prepayment.

(3) The person files a request for an adjustment.

(b) For purposes of this section, “modified adjusted daily rate” means the modified adjusted rate per annum as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 6591.5 determined on a daily basis by dividing the modified adjusted rate per annum by 365.

(c) For purposes of this section, “business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or any day designated as a state holiday.

(d) This section shall not apply to any payment made pursuant to a deficiency determination, a determination where no return has been filed, or a jeopardy determination issued by the
 department.

(e) This section shall only apply to electronic payments or prepayments of taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 14.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6592.

(a) (1) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person shall be relieved of the penalties provided by Sections 6452.05, 6476, 6477, 6479.3, 6480.4, 6511, 6565, 6591, 7051.2, 7073, and 7074.

(2) If the department finds, with respect to the information return required by Section 6452.05, that a person’s failure to accurately disclose information is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person shall be
 relieved of the relevant penalty provided by Section 6591.3.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), a person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the penalty for any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the
 duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(d) The department shall establish criteria that provides for efficient resolution of requests for relief pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 4.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6592.5.

Any person who is granted relief from the penalty imposed by Section 6476 or 6477 shall pay, in addition to any prepayment, interest at the “modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof” established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6591.5, from the date on which the prepayment would have been due until the date of payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1109, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6593.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment was due to a disaster, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the interest provided by Sections 6459, 6480.4, 6480.8, 6513, 6591, and 6592.5.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a person seeking to be relieved of the interest shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which that person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the interest for any person in
 an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 5.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6593.5.

(a) The department, in its discretion, may relieve all or any part of the interest imposed on a person by this part under the following circumstances:

(1) Where the failure to pay tax is due in whole or in part to an unreasonable error or delay by an employee of the department acting in their official capacity.

(2) Where failure to pay sales or use tax was the direct result of an error or delay by a state agency that collects the tax on behalf of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(b) For purposes of this section, an error or delay shall be deemed to have occurred only if no
 significant aspect of the error or delay is attributable to an act of, or a failure to act by, the taxpayer.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based and any other information which the department may require.

(d) The department may grant relief only for interest imposed on tax liabilities that arise during taxable periods commencing on or after July 1, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 6.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6594.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, no interest or penalties shall be assessed against any person for failure to make payments of any taxes on leases of personal property to the United States government while the board is enjoined from collecting such taxes by order of the United States District Court for the Central District of California in the case of United States of America v. California State Board of Equalization, No. CV 79-03359-R, provided that payment of any applicable taxes is made within 60 days after the board is no longer enjoined from collecting such taxes.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6593 (as added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1194) by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 403.)
-------------------------------------------

6596.

(a) If the board finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to the person’s reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, the person may be relieved of the taxes imposed by Sections 6051 and 6201 and any penalty or interest added thereto. 

(b) For the purpose of this section, a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment shall be considered to be due to reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, only if the board finds that all of the following conditions are satisfied: 

(1) The person requested in writing that the board advise him or her whether a particular activity or transaction is subject to tax under this part. The specific facts and circumstances of the activity or transaction shall be fully described in the request. 

(2) The board responded in writing to the person regarding the written request for advice, stating whether or not the described activity or transaction is subject to tax, or stating the conditions under which the activity or transaction is subject to tax.

(3) In reasonable reliance on the board’s written advice, the person did not do either of the following: 

(A) Charge or collect from his or her customers amounts designated as sales tax reimbursement or use tax for the described activity or
 transaction. 

(B) Pay a use tax on the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property. 

(4) The liability for taxes applied to a particular activity or transaction which occurred before either of the following: 

(A) Before the board rescinded or modified the advice so given, by sending written notice to the person of the rescinded or modified advice. 

(B) Before a change in statutory or constitutional law, a change in the board’s regulations, or a final decision of a court, which renders the board’s earlier written advice no longer valid. 

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board: 

(1) A copy of the person’s written request to the board and a copy of the board’s written advice. 

(2) A statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based. 

(3) Any other information which the board may require. 

(d) Only the person making the written request shall be entitled to rely on the board’s written advice to that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6597.

(a) (1) Any person who knowingly collects sales tax reimbursement, as defined in Section 1656.1 of the Civil Code, or who knowingly collects use tax pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201), and who fails to timely remit that sales tax reimbursement or use tax to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, shall be liable for a penalty of 40 percent of the amount not timely remitted.

(2) (A) This subdivision shall not apply to any person whose liability for the unremitted sales tax reimbursement or use tax described in paragraph (1) averages one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or less per month or does not exceed 25 percent of the total amount of tax
 liability for which the sales tax reimbursement or use tax was collected for the period in which tax was due, whichever is greater.

(B) If a person’s failure to make a timely remittance of sales tax reimbursement or use tax is due to a reasonable cause or circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person shall be relieved of the penalty imposed by this subdivision.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Reasonable cause or circumstances beyond the person’s control” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) The occurrence of a death or serious illness of the person or the person’s next of kin that caused the person’s failure to make a
 timely remittance.

(B) The occurrence of an emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code that caused the person’s failure to make a timely remittance.

(C) A natural disaster or other catastrophe directly affecting the business operations of the person that caused the person’s failure to make a timely remittance.

(D) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration failed to send returns or other information to the correct address of record, that caused the person’s failure to make a timely remittance.

(E) The person’s failure to make a timely remittance occurred only once over a three-year period, or once during the period in which the person was engaged in business, whichever time period is shorter.

(F) The person voluntarily corrected errors in remitting sales tax reimbursement or use tax collected that were made in previous reporting periods and remitted payment of the liability owed as a result of those errors prior to being contacted by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration regarding possible errors or discrepancies.

(2) “Sales tax reimbursement” shall also include any sales tax that is advertised, held out, or stated to the public or to any customer, directly or indirectly, that the tax or any part thereof will be assumed or absorbed by the retailer.

(c) This section shall apply to any determination made by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6481), Article 3 (commencing with Section 6511), and Article 4 (commencing with
 Section 6536).

(d) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to determinations made on or after January 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 13.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Collection of Tax [6701. - 6850.]



  ARTICLE 1. Security for Tax [6701. - 6704.]

6701.

The department, whenever it deems it necessary to ensure compliance with this part, may require any person subject thereto, to place with it any security that the department may determine. Any security in the form of cash, government bonds, or insured deposits in banks or savings and loan institutions shall be held by the department in trust to be used solely in the manner provided by this section and Section 6815. The amount of the security shall be fixed by the department but, except as noted below, shall not be greater than twice the estimated average liability of persons filing returns for quarterly periods or three times the estimated average liability of persons required to file returns for monthly periods, determined in the manner that the department deems proper, or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000),
 whichever amount is the lesser. In case of a person who, pursuant to Section 6070 of this part, has been given notice of hearing to show cause why their permit or permits should not be revoked, or a person whose permit or permits has been revoked or suspended, the amount of the security shall not be greater than three times the average liability of persons filing returns for quarterly periods or five times the average liability of persons required to file returns for monthly periods, or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), whichever amount is the lesser. The limitations herein provided apply regardless of the type of security placed with the department. The amount of the security may be increased or decreased by the department subject to the limitations herein provided. Security held by the department shall be released after a three-year period in which the person has filed all returns and paid all tax to the state or any amount of tax required to be collected and paid to the state within the time required. The
 department may sell the security at public auction if it becomes necessary to do so in order to recover any tax or any amount required to be collected, interest, or penalty due. Notice of the sale may be served upon the person who placed the security in the manner prescribed for service of a notice of a deficiency determination. Upon any sale, any surplus above the amounts due shall be returned to the person who placed the security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 14.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6702.

(a) If any person is delinquent in the payment of the amount required to be paid by him or her or in the event a determination has been made against him or her which remains unpaid, the board may, not later than three years after the payment became delinquent, or within 10 years after the last recording of an abstract under Section 6738 or the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, give notice thereof personally or by first-class mail to all persons, including any officer or department of the state or any political subdivision or agency of the state, having in their
 possession or under their control any credits or other personal property belonging to the delinquent, or person against whom a determination has been made which remains unpaid, or owing any debts to the delinquent or that person. In the case of any state officer, department, or agency, the notice shall be given to the officer, department, or agency prior to the time it presents the claim of the delinquent taxpayer to the Controller. After receiving the notice the persons so notified shall neither transfer nor make any other disposition of the credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession or under their control at the time they receive the notice until the board consents to a transfer or disposition or until 60 days elapse after the receipt of the notice, whichever period expires the earlier. All persons so notified shall forthwith after receipt of the notice advise the board of all those credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession, under their control, or owing by
 them.

(b) If the notice seeks to prevent the transfer or other disposition of a deposit in a bank or a state or federal savings and loan association or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank or a state or federal savings and loan association, the notice to be effective shall state the amount, interest, and penalty due from the person, and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of the bank or a state or federal savings and loan association at which the deposit is carried or at which the credits or personal property is held. A bank, state or federal savings and loan association, or a state or federal credit union withholding any deposit or other credits or personal property required to be withheld in which the delinquent taxpayer and another person or persons have an interest, or held in the name of a third party or parties in which the delinquent taxpayer is ultimately determined to have
 no interest, is not liable therefor to any of the persons who have an interest in the deposit or other credits or personal property unless the deposit or other credits or personal property is released or transferred to the delinquent taxpayer.

(c) In the case of a deposit or other credits or personal property for which the transfer or other disposition is prevented, the depository institution required to prevent transfer or other disposition shall send a notice by first-class mail to each person named on a deposit, other credits, or personal property included in the notice from the board, provided a current address for each person is available to the institution. This notice shall inform each person as to the reason for preventing transfer or disposition of the deposit or other credits or personal property, the amount thereof which is prevented from transfer or other disposition, and the date by which that amount is to be remitted to the board.
 An institution may assess the deposit or other credits or personal property of each person receiving this notice a reasonable service charge not to exceed three dollars ($3).
